Delaware, session 153, SB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 3004Q, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3004Q. Restrictions; polystyrene foam food service packaging [Effective July 1, 2025]. (a) A food establishment may not provide ready-to-eat food to a consumer in polystyrene foam food service packaging. (b) This section does not apply to any of the following: (3) Food provided in a Level IV or Level V Department of Correction facility.